nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen > Opslagkisten: Dekenkisten; Uitzetkast; Opbergkisten; Speelgoedkisten
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring > Lagringskistor: Sängkistor; Brudkistor; Koffertar; Leksakslådor
zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物 > 储物箱: 毛毯收纳箱; 储物木箱; 储物箱; 玩具柜
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana > Škrinje za odlaganje: Škrinje za deke; Škrinje za posteljinu; Kovčezi za pohranu; Škrinje za igračke
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장 > 보관 상자: 담요 수납함; 혼수함; 수납 트렁크; 완구함
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları > Eşya Saklama Sandıkları: Battaniye sandıkları; Çeyiz Sandıkları; Saklama sandıkları; Oyuncak Sandıkları
de: Möbel > Schränke > Aufbewahrungstruhen: Wäschetruhen; Aussteuertruhen; Aufbewahrungstruhen; Spielzeugtruhen
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring > Dragkister: Tæppekister; Brudekister; Opbevaringskister; Legetøjskister
fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys > Säilytysarkut: Peittoarkut; Puuarkut; Säilytysarkut; Leluarkut
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage > Storage Chests: Blanket Chests; Hope Chests; Storage Trunks; Toy Chests
bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение > Сандъци за съхранение: Сандъци за одеяла; Сандъци за чеиз; Сандъци за съхранение; Сандъци за играчки
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók > Tárolóládák: Takarótartó ládák; Kelengyeládák; Tárolóládák; Játékosládák
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento > Baús de arrumação: Arcas de mantas; Arcas; Baús de arrumação; Arcas para brinquedos
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory > Úložné truhly: Truhly na lůžkoviny; Truhly na výbavu; Úložné kufry a truhly; Truhly na hračky
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky > Úložné truhlice: Truhlice na prikrývky; Truhlice na oblečenie; Skladovacie truhlice; Truhlice na hračky
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納 > 收納箱: 毛毯收納箱; 嫁妝箱; 收納箱; 玩具箱
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng > Rương trữ đồ: Tủ rương đựng chăn; Hòm đựng đồ; Rương chứa đồ; Rương đồ chơi
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje > Skrinje za shranjevanje: Skrinje za odeje; Skrinje za doto; Kovčki za shranjevanje; Skrinje za igrače
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie > Skrzynie i kufry: Skrzynie na koce; Skrzynie; Kufry do przechowywania; Skrzynie na zabawki
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento > Caixas de armazenamento: Baús para cobertores; Baús de enxoval; Baús de armazenamento; Caixas de brinquedo
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas > Sandėliavimo skrynios: Patalynės skrynios; Kraičio skrynios; Daiktų laikymo skrynios; Žaislų dėžės
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения > Сундуки: Сундуки для белья; Сундуки-комоды; Сундуки для хранения; Сундуки для игрушек
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement > Coffres de rangement: Coffres à couvertures; Trousseaux; Malles de rangement; Coffres à jouets
ja: 家具 > 収納家具 > 収納ボックス: ブランケットチェスト; ベンチ型収納ボックス; 収納トランク; おもちゃ箱
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare > Cufere de depozitare: Cufere pentru pături; Lăzi de zestre; Cufere de depozitare; Cufere pentru jucării
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti > Bauli e cassapanche: Cassapanche; Cassapanche; Bauli portaoggetti; Scatole portagiochi
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση > Κουτιά/κιβώτια αποθήκευσης: Μπαούλα για κουβέρτες; Παραδοσιακά μπαούλα προίκας; Μπαούλα αποθήκευσης; Κιβώτια για παιχνίδια
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento > Baúles de almacenamiento: Baúles para mantas; Baúles para el ajuar; Baúles de almacenamiento; Baúles para juguetes
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ > ชั้นที่มีลิ้นชัก: หีบเก็บผ้าห่ม; หีบเก็บของ; หีบเก็บของ; หีบใส่ของเล่น
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring > Lagringskister: Sengetøykister; Brudekister; Oppbevaringskister; Lekekister